California statutes. Water Code
(3) A program of implementation needed for achieving water quality objectives.

(k) “Contamination” means an impairment of the quality of the waters of the state by waste to a degree which creates a hazard to the public health through poisoning or through the spread of disease. “Contamination” includes any equivalent effect resulting from the disposal of waste, whether or not waters of the state are affected. 

(l) (1) “Pollution” means an alteration of the quality of the waters of the state by waste to a degree which unreasonably affects either of the following:

(A) The waters for beneficial uses.

(B) Facilities which serve these beneficial uses.

(2) “Pollution” may include “contamination.”

(m) “Nuisance” means anything which meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is injurious to health, or is indecent or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property. 

(2) Affects at the same time an entire community or neighborhood, or any considerable number of persons, although the extent of the annoyance or damage inflicted upon individuals may be unequal. 

(3) Occurs during, or as a result of, the treatment or disposal of wastes.

(n) “Recycled water” means water which, as a result of treatment of waste, is suitable for a direct beneficial use or a controlled use that would not otherwise occur and is therefor considered a valuable resource.

(o) “Citizen or domiciliary” of the state includes a foreign corporation having substantial business contacts in the state or which is subject to service of process in this state.

(p) (1) “Hazardous substance” means either of the following:

(A) For discharge to surface waters, any substance determined to be a hazardous substance pursuant to Section 311(b)(2) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.).

(B) For discharge to groundwater, any substance listed as a hazardous waste or hazardous material pursuant to Section 25140 of the Health and Safety Code, without regard to whether the substance is intended to be used, reused, or discarded, except that “hazardous substance” does not include any substance excluded from Section 311(b)(2) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act because it is within the scope of Section 311(a)(1) of that act.

(2) “Hazardous substance” does not include any of the following:

(A) Nontoxic, nonflammable, and noncorrosive stormwater runoff drained from underground vaults, chambers, or manholes into gutters or storm sewers.

(B) Any pesticide which is applied for agricultural purposes or is applied in accordance with a cooperative agreement authorized by Section 116180 of the Health and Safety Code, and is not discharged accidentally or for purposes of disposal, the application of which is in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

(C) Any discharge to surface water of a quantity less than a reportable quantity as determined by regulations issued pursuant to Section 311(b)(4) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.

(D) Any discharge to land which results, or probably will result, in a discharge to groundwater if the amount of the discharge to land is less than a reportable quantity, as determined by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 13271, for substances listed as hazardous pursuant to Section 25140 of the Health and Safety Code. No discharge shall be deemed a discharge of a reportable quantity until regulations set a reportable quantity for the substance discharged.

(q) (1) “Mining waste” means all solid, semisolid, and liquid waste materials from the extraction, beneficiation, and processing of ores and minerals. Mining waste includes, but is not limited to, soil, waste rock, and overburden, as defined in Section 2732 of the Public Resources Code, and tailings, slag, and other processed waste materials, including cementitious materials that are managed at the cement manufacturing facility where the materials were generated.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “cementitious material” means cement, cement kiln dust, clinker, and clinker dust.

(r) “Master recycling permit” means a permit issued to a supplier or a distributor, or both, of recycled water, that includes waste discharge requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13263 and water recycling requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13523.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 429.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13051.

As used in this division, “injection well” means any bored, drilled, or driven shaft, dug pit, or hole in the ground into which waste or fluid is discharged, and any associated subsurface appurtenances, and the depth of which is greater than the circumference of the shaft, pit, or hole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1591, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. State Water Quality Control [13100. - 13198.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Water Resources Control Board [13100. - 13100.]

13100.

There is in the Resources Agency the State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards. The organization, membership, and some of the duties of the state board are provided for in Article 3 (commencing with Section 174) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 596.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Policy for Water Quality Control [13140. - 13149.2.]

13140.

The state board shall formulate and adopt state policy for water quality control. Such policy shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of this article and shall be in conformity with the policies set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13141.

State policy for water quality control adopted or revised in accordance with the provisions of this article, and regional water quality control plans approved or revised in accordance with Section 13245, shall become a part of the California Water Plan effective when such state policy for water quality control, and such regional water quality control plans have been reported to the Legislature at any session thereof.

However, prior to implementation of any agricultural water quality control program, an estimate of the total cost of such a program, together with an identification of potential sources of financing, shall be indicated
 in any regional water quality control plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

13142.

State policy for water quality control shall consist of all or any of the following:

(a) Water quality principles and guidelines for long-range resource planning, including ground water and surface water management programs and control and use of recycled water.

(b) Water quality objectives at key locations for planning and operation of water resource development projects and for water quality control activities.

(c) Other principles and guidelines deemed essential by the state board for water quality control.

The principles, guidelines, and objectives shall be consistent with the state goal of providing a decent home and suitable living environment for every Californian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13142.5.

In addition to any other policies established pursuant to this division, the policies of the state with respect to water quality as it relates to the coastal marine environment are that:

(a) Wastewater discharges shall be treated to protect present and future beneficial uses, and, where feasible, to restore past beneficial uses of the receiving waters. Highest priority shall be given to improving or eliminating discharges that adversely affect any of the following:

(1) Wetlands, estuaries, and other biologically sensitive sites.

(2) Areas important for water contact sports.

(3) Areas that produce shellfish for human consumption.

(4) Ocean areas subject to massive waste discharge.

Ocean chemistry and mixing processes, marine life conditions, other present or proposed outfalls in the vicinity, and relevant aspects of areawide waste treatment management plans and programs, but not of convenience to the discharger, shall for the purposes of this section, be considered in determining the effects of such discharges. Toxic and hard-to-treat substances should be pretreated at the source if such substances would be incompatible with effective and economical treatment in municipal
 treatment plants.

(b) For each new or expanded coastal powerplant or other industrial installation using seawater for cooling, heating, or industrial processing, the best available site, design, technology, and mitigation measures feasible shall be used to minimize the intake and mortality of all forms of marine life.

(c) Where otherwise permitted, new warmed or cooled water discharges into coastal wetlands or into areas of special biological importance, including marine reserves and kelp beds, shall not significantly alter the overall ecological balance of the receiving area.

(d) Independent baseline studies of the existing marine system should be conducted in the area that could be affected by a new or expanded industrial facility using seawater in advance of the carrying out of the development.

(e) (1) Adequately treated recycled water should, where feasible, be made available to supplement existing surface and underground supplies and to assist in meeting future water requirements of the coastal zone, and consideration, in statewide programs of financial assistance for water pollution or water quality control, shall be given to providing optimum water recycling and use of recycled water.

(2) If recycled water is available for industrial use, any discharge to waters in the coastal zone, including the San Francisco Bay, after industrial use, may be authorized if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The discharge will not unreasonably affect beneficial uses.

(B) The discharge is consistent with applicable water quality
 control plans and state policy for water quality control.

(C) The use of recycled water is consistent with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 13500).

(D) The discharge is consistent with all applicable requirements of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13370).

(E) The discharge is to the same general receiving water location as that to which the wastewater would be discharged if not reused.

(3) Any requirement imposed pursuant to Section 13263 or 13377 shall be adjusted to reflect a credit for waste present in the recycled water before reuse. The credit shall be limited to the difference between the amount of waste present in the nonrecycled water supply otherwise available to the industry and the amount of waste present in the recycled water.

(4) If the amount of waste in the discharge exceeds prescribed requirements because the amount of waste in the recycled water is in excess of that agreed to be furnished by the supplier to the discharger, no enforcement action shall be taken against the discharger unless both of the following statements apply:

(A) The supplier of the recycled water fails to correct the problem within 30 days after the cause of the problem is identified, or within any greater period of time agreed to by the appropriate regional board.

(B) The discharger continues to receive the recycled water from the supplier.

(f) This section shall not apply to industrial discharges into publicly owned treatment works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13143.

State policy for water quality control shall be periodically reviewed and may be revised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13144.

During the process of formulating or revising state policy for water quality control the state board shall consult with and carefully evaluate the recommendations of concerned federal, state, and local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13145.

The state board shall take into consideration the effect of its actions pursuant to this chapter on the California Water Plan as adopted or revised pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 10000) of this code, and on any other general or coordinated governmental plan looking toward the development, utilization, or conservation of the waters of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13146.

State offices, departments and boards, in carrying out activities which affect water quality, shall comply with state policy for water quality control unless otherwise directed or authorized by statute, in which case they shall indicate to the state board in writing their authority for not complying with such policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13147.

The state board shall not adopt state policy for water quality control unless a public hearing is first held respecting the adoption of such policy. At least 60 days in advance of such hearing the state board shall notify any affected regional boards, unless notice is waived by such boards, and shall give notice of such hearing by publication within the affected region pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. The regional boards shall submit written recommendations to the state board at least 20 days in advance of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

13148.

(a) This section applies to the following hydrologic regions as identified in the California Water Plan: Central Coast, South Coast, San Joaquin River, Tulare Lake, and the Counties of Butte, Glenn, Placer, Sacramento, Solano, Sutter, and Yolo.

(b) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 116775) of Chapter 5 of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, any local agency that owns or
 operates a community sewer system or water recycling facility and that is subject to a finding made by a regional board pursuant to subdivision (e) may take action to control salinity input from residential self-regenerating water softeners to protect the quality of the waters of the state. A local agency may take action only by adoption of an ordinance or resolution after a public hearing. The local agency shall not consider the adoption of an ordinance or resolution until at least 30 days following the date of the public hearing on the proposed ordinance or resolution. An ordinance or resolution shall become effective 30 days from the date of adoption.

(c) Actions to control residential self-regenerating water softener salinity inputs authorized by subdivision (b) include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Require that residential self-regenerating water
 softeners installed within the jurisdiction of the local agency be rated at the highest efficiency commercially available and certified by NSF International or the American National Standards Institute.

(2) Require that plumbing permits be obtained prior to the installation of residential self-regenerating water softeners.

(3) Require that residential self-regenerating water softeners be plumbed to hook up to hot water only.

(4) Enact a voluntary buy-back or exchange program for residential self-regenerating water softeners, consistent with existing law. A voluntary buy-back or exchange program may be conducted in cooperation with local water treatment businesses.

(5) Require the removal of previously installed residential self-regenerating water
 softeners.

(6) Prohibit the installation of residential self-regenerating water softeners.

(7) Require the retrofit of clock control and demand control systems on previously installed residential self-regenerating water softeners.

(8) Require the replacement of previously installed residential self-regenerating water softeners with appliances that meet or exceed the salt efficiency rating set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 116785 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) If a local agency adopts an ordinance or resolution to require the removal of previously installed residential self-regenerating water softeners pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), the local agency shall make available to owners of residential self-regenerating
 water softeners within its service area a program to compensate the owner of the residential self-regenerating water softener for the reasonable value of the removed residential self-regenerating water softener, as determined by the local agency.

(e) Before a local agency may take action to control salinity input from residential self-regenerating water softeners pursuant to subdivision (b), a regional board with jurisdiction over a region identified in subdivision (a) shall have made a finding at a public hearing that the control of residential salinity input will contribute to the achievement of water quality objectives. The finding may be made in any of the following water quality actions adopted by a regional board:

(1) A total maximum daily load that addresses salinity-related pollutants in a water segment.

(2) A salt and nutrient management plan for a groundwater basin or subbasin.

(3) Waste discharge requirements for a local agency discharger.

(4) Master reclamation permit for a supplier or distributor of recycled water.

(5) Water recycling requirements for a supplier or distributor of recycled water.

(6) Cease and desist order directed to a local agency.

(f) The regional board making a finding pursuant to subdivision (e) shall base its finding on the evidence in the record, such as a source determination study or other appropriate studies. The standard of judicial review required for a finding made pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be the same as the standard of review
 required for the water quality action in which the finding is made.

(g) This section does not limit the use of portable exchange water softening appliances or limit the authority of a local agency to regulate the discharge from a centralized portable exchange tank servicing facility into the community sewer system.

(h) For purposes of this section, “residential self-regenerating water softener” means residential water softening equipment or conditioning appliances that discharge brine into a community sewer system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 527, Sec. 2.   (AB 1366)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

13149.

(a) (1) (A) The board, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall adopt principles and guidelines for diversion and use of water for cannabis cultivation in areas where cannabis cultivation may have the potential to substantially affect instream flows. The principles and guidelines adopted under this section may include, but are not limited to, instream
 flow objectives, limits on diversions, and requirements for screening of diversions and elimination of barriers to fish passage. The principles and guidelines may include requirements that apply to groundwater extractions where the board determines those requirements are reasonably necessary for purposes of this section.

(B) Prior to adopting principles and guidelines under this section, the board shall allow for public comment and hearing, pursuant to Section 13147. The board shall provide an opportunity for the public to review and comment on the proposal for at least 60 days and shall consider the public comments before adopting the principles and guidelines.

(2) The board, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall adopt principles and guidelines pending the development of long-term principles and guidelines under paragraph (1). The principles and
 guidelines, including the interim principles and guidelines, shall include measures to protect springs, wetlands, and aquatic habitats from negative impacts of cannabis cultivation. The board may update the interim principles and guidelines as it determines to be reasonably necessary for purposes of this section.

(3) The Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the board, may establish interim requirements to protect fish and wildlife from the impacts of diversions for cannabis cultivation pending the adoption of long-term principles and guidelines by the board under paragraph (1). The requirements may also include measures to protect springs, wetlands, and aquatic habitats from negative impacts of cannabis cultivation.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 15300.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, actions of the board and the
 Department of Fish and Wildlife under this section shall be deemed to be within Section 15308 of Title 14 of the California Code of regulations, provided that those actions do not involve relaxation of existing streamflow standards.

(2) The board shall adopt principles and guidelines under this section as part of state policy for water quality control adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 13140) of Chapter 3 of Division 7.

(3) If the Department of Fish and Wildlife establishes interim requirements under this section, it shall do so as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of those interim requirements is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
 safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the emergency regulations shall remain in effect until revised by the Department of Fish and Wildlife, provided that the emergency regulations shall not apply after long-term principles and guidelines adopted by the board under this section take effect for the stream or other body of water where the diversion is located.

(4) A diversion for cannabis cultivation is subject to both the interim principles and guidelines and the interim requirements in the period before final principles and guidelines are adopted by the board.

(5) The board shall have primary enforcement responsibility for principles and guidelines adopted under this section, and shall notify the Department of Cannabis Control of any enforcement action
 taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 116.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13149.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to facilitate the development of analyses and findings that apply environmental justice objectives, goals, and policies adopted by the state board and the regional boards in a transparent and inclusive manner.

(b) When adopting water quality control plans or state policies for water quality control, including amendments to those plans and policies that incorporate an implementation program allowing time to comply with water quality objectives, 
 the state board or a regional board shall make a concise, programmatic finding on potential environmental justice, tribal impact, and racial equity considerations related to the adoption. The finding shall be based on readily available information identified by staff or raised during the public review process and shall include both of the following:

(1) A concise summary of the anticipated water quality impact in disadvantaged or tribal communities as a result of the permitted activity or facility, and any environmental justice concerns within the scope of the state board or regional board’s authority previously raised to the applicable board by interested persons with regard to these impacts.

(2) Identification of measures available and within the scope of the
 state board or regional board’s authority to address the impacts of the permitted activity or facility in a disadvantaged or tribal community.

(c) When issuing or reissuing regional or statewide waste discharge requirements or waivers of waste discharge requirements, the state board or a regional board shall make a concise, programmatic finding on potential environmental justice, tribal impact, and racial equity considerations related to the issuance. For reissuances, the finding may be limited to considerations related to any changes to the requirements of the prior waste discharge requirements or waivers of waste discharge requirements. The finding shall be based on readily available information identified by staff or raised during the public review process and include the information specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of
 subdivision (b).

(d) When issuing or reissuing individual waste discharge requirements or waivers of waste discharge
 requirements that regulate activity or a facility that may impact a disadvantaged or tribal community, and that includes a time schedule in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 13263 for achieving an applicable water quality objective, an alternative compliance path that allows time to come into compliance with water quality objectives, or a water quality variance, the state board or a regional board shall make a finding on potential environmental justice, tribal impact, and racial equity considerations. For reissuances, the finding may be limited to considerations related to any changes to the requirements of the prior waste discharge requirements or waivers of waste discharge
 requirements. The finding shall be based on readily available information identified by staff or raised during the public review process and include the information specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b). This subdivision does not apply to the use of mixing zones or dilution credits.

(e) This section does not apply to certifications issued pursuant to Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341) or enrollments of dischargers under general waste discharge requirements or general waivers of waste discharge requirements.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Disadvantaged community”
 means a community in which the median household income is less than 80 percent of the statewide annual median household income level.

(2) “Environmental justice” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30107.3 of the Public Resources Code.

(3) “Tribal community” means a community within a federally recognized California Native American tribe or nonfederally recognized Native American tribe on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 347, Sec. 3.   (AB 2108)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Powers and Duties of the State Board [13160. - 13194.]

13160.

(a) The state board is designated as the state water pollution control agency for all purposes stated in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) and any other existing or subsequently enacted federal
 water quality control law.

(b) (1) The state board is authorized to give any certificate or statement required by any federal agency pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or any other federal water quality control law that there is reasonable assurance that an activity of any person subject to the jurisdiction of the state board will
 comply with applicable requirements of that federal law or any other appropriate requirements of state law.

(2) The state board may issue the certificate or statement under paragraph (1) before completion of the environmental review required under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code if the state board determines that waiting until completion of that environmental review to issue the certificate or statement poses a substantial risk of waiver of the state board’s certification authority under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or any other federal water quality control law. To the extent authorized by federal law, the state board shall reserve authority to reopen and, after public notice, an opportunity for
 comment, and, when appropriate, an opportunity for a hearing, revise the certificate or statement as appropriate to incorporate feasible measures to avoid or reduce significant environmental impacts or to make any necessary findings based on the information provided in the environmental document prepared for the project.

(c) The state board is authorized
 to exercise any powers delegated to the state and carry out any program a state is authorized to administer under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) and any amendments to that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 18, Sec. 9.   (AB 92)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13160.1.

(a) The state board may establish a reasonable fee schedule to cover the costs incurred by the state board and the regional boards in connection with any certificate that is required or authorized by any federal law with respect to the effect of any existing or proposed facility, project, or construction work upon the quality of waters of the state, including certificates requested by applicants for a federal permit or license pursuant to Section 401 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, and certificates requested pursuant to Section 169 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, with respect to water pollution control facilities.

(b) In providing for the recovery
 of costs incurred by the state board and regional board pursuant to this section, the state board may include in the fee schedule, but is not limited to including, the costs incurred in reviewing applications for certificates, prescribing terms of certificates and monitoring requirements, enforcing and evaluating compliance with certificates and monitoring requirements, conducting monitoring and modeling, analyzing laboratory samples, reviewing documents prepared for the purpose of regulating activities subject to certificates, and administrative costs incurred in connection with carrying out these actions. The costs of reviewing applications for certificates include, but are not limited to, the costs incurred in anticipation of the filing of an application for a certificate, including participation in any prefiling consultation, and investigation or studies to evaluate the impacts of the proposed
 activity.

(c) (1) The fee schedule may provide for payment of a single fee in connection with the filing of an application, or for periodic or annual fees, as appropriate to the type of certificate issued and the activity authorized by the certificate.

(2) The fee schedule authorized by this section may impose a fee upon any of the following:

(A) Any person who files an application for a certificate.

(B) Any person who files with the state board or a regional board a notice of intent to file an application for a certificate, or who files with a federal agency a notice of intent to apply for a federal permit or license for which a certificate
 will be required under Section 401 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.

(C) Any person holding a federal permit or license for which a certificate has been issued.

(D) Any person required to send a notice of intent to the state board or a regional board to proceed with an activity permitted by a general permit subject to certification under Section 13160.

(d) (1) If the state board establishes a fee schedule pursuant to this section, the state board shall adopt the fee schedule by emergency regulation. The state board shall set the amount of total revenues collected each year through the fee authorized by this section at an amount equal to the revenue levels set forth in the annual Budget Act
 for this activity. The state board shall review and revise the fee each fiscal year as necessary to conform with the revenue levels set forth in the annual Budget Act. If the state board determines that the revenue collected during the preceding year was greater than, or less than, the revenue levels set forth in the annual Budget Act, the state board may further adjust the annual fees to compensate for the over or under collection of revenue.

(2) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision, any amendment thereto, or subsequent adjustments to the annual fees, shall be adopted by the state board in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law
 as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by the state board, or adjustments to the annual fees made by the state board pursuant to this section, shall remain in effect until revised by the state board.

(e) Any fees collected pursuant to this section in connection with certificates for activities subject to Section 1551 shall be deposited into the Water Rights Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 24.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13161.

The state board shall annually determine state needs for water quality research and recommend projects to be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13162.

The state board shall administer any statewide program of research in the technical phases of water quality control which may be delegated to it by law and may accept funds from the United States or any person to that end. The state board may conduct such a program independently, or by contract or in cooperation with any federal or state agency, including any political subdivision of the state, or any person or public or private organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13163.

(a) The state board shall coordinate water-quality-related investigations of state agencies, recognizing that other state agencies have primary statutory authority for such investigations, and shall consult with the concerned regional boards in implementing this section.

(b) The state board from time to time shall evaluate the need for water-quality-related investigations to effectively develop and implement statewide policy for water quality control and shall transmit its recommendations for investigations to affected or concerned federal, state, and local agencies. The affected state agencies shall comply with the recommendations or shall advise the state board in writing why they do not comply with such recommendations.

(c) State agencies shall submit to the state board plans for and results of all investigations that relate to or have an effect upon water quality for review and comment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13164.

The state board shall formulate, adopt and revise general procedures for the formulation, adoption and implementation by regional boards of water quality control plans. During the process of formulating or revising such procedures, the state board shall consult with and evaluate the recommendations of any affected regional boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

13165.

The state board may require any state or local agency to investigate and report on any technical factors involved in water quality control; provided that the burden, including costs, of such reports shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the reports and the benefits to be obtained therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13166.

The state board, with the assistance of the regional boards, shall prepare and implement a statewide water quality information storage and retrieval program. Such program shall be coordinated and integrated to the maximum extent practicable with data storage and retrieval programs of other agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13167.

(a) The state board shall implement, with the assistance of the regional boards, a public information program on matters involving water quality, and shall place and maintain on its Internet Web site, in a format accessible to the general public, an information file on water quality monitoring, assessment, research, standards, regulation, enforcement, and other pertinent matters.

(b) The information file described in subdivision (a) shall include, but need not be limited to, copies of permits, waste discharge requirements, waivers, enforcement actions, and petitions for review of these actions pursuant to this division. The file shall include copies of water quality control plans and policies, including any relevant management agency agreements pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13200), and monitoring data and assessment information, or shall identify Internet links to that information. The state board, in consultation with the regional boards, shall ensure that the information is available in single locations, rather than separately by region, and that the information is presented in a manner easily understandable by the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 750, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13167.5.

(a) The state board or the regional board, as applicable, shall provide notice and a period of at least 30 days for public comment prior to the adoption of any of the following:

(1) Waste discharge requirements prescribed pursuant to Sections 13263 or 13377.

(2) Water reclamation requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13523.

(3) An order issued pursuant to Section 13320.

(4) A time schedule order adopted pursuant to Section 13300 that sets forth a schedule of compliance and required actions relating to waste discharge requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13263 or 13377.

(b) The notification required by subdivision (a) may be provided by mailing a draft of the waste discharge requirements, water reclamation requirements, time schedule order, or order issued pursuant to Section 13320 to each person who has requested notice of the specific item, or by posting a draft of the respective requirements or order on the official Internet site maintained by the state board or regional board, and providing notice of that posting by electronic mail to each person who has requested notice.

(c) This section does not require the state board or the regional board to provide more than one notice or more than one public comment period prior to the adoption of waste discharge requirements, water reclamation requirements, a time schedule order, or an order issued pursuant to Section 13320.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13167.6.
